Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 4B Interstate Compact for Juveniles
49-4B-3.
Role of Governor in implementation of compact; promulgation of rules and regulations by board.

With respect to the Interstate Compact for Juveniles set out in Code Section 49-4B-2:

The Governor shall by executive order establish the initial composition, terms, and compensation of the Georgia State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision required by Article IX of that compact, with the Governor making the appointments to those positions; provided, however, that there shall be two representatives from the legislative branch of government and one representative from the judicial branch of government who shall be appointed as follows:

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall make one appointment of a legislative branch representative;

The President of the Senate shall make one appointment of a legislative branch representative; and

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall make one appointment of a judicial branch representative;

The Governor shall by executive order establish the qualifications, term, and compensation of the compact administrator required by Article III of that compact, with the state council making the appointment of the compact administrator;

The Governor shall by executive order provide for any other matters necessary for implementation of the compact at the time that it becomes effective; and

Except as otherwise provided for in this Code section, the board may promulgate rules or regulations necessary to implement and administer the compact, subject to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4B-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 763, § 2-1/HB 898; Ga. L. 2018, p. 201, § 2/HB 670.

The 2018 amendment,

rewrote paragraph (1). For effective date, see the Editor’s note.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 201, § 2/HB 670, provided: “(a) If a legislative branch representative is appointed and serving on the Georgia State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision on June 30, 2018, then this Act shall become effective upon the termination of his or her term of service.

“(b) If a legislative branch representative has not been appointed and is not serving on such council on June 30, 2018, then this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2018.” A legislative branch representative had not been appointed and was not serving on such council on June 30, 2018, so the Act became effective on July 1, 2018.